Idaho, session 2025, S1115.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 5, Title 40, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 40-529, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
40-529. PLANNING AND ENVIRONMENTAL LINKAGES STUDIES AUTHORIZED -- EF-
FICIENT AND SAFE HIGHWAY LINKAGES. (1) It is the intent of the legislature to
determine how the Idaho state highway system could be improved to facilitate
safer and more efficient highway linkages in Idaho, including the study of
existing and alternate routes.
(2) The Idaho transportation department is authorized and shall so-
licit requests for proposals for the purpose of conducting planning and
environmental linkages (PEL) studies to determine the most efficient and
safe north-south highway routes in Idaho. Such studies shall include:
(a) A study of the efficient and safe transportation of commerce and
the traveling public specific to the state highway 95, state highway 55,
and state highway 16 corridors from the treasure valley, including the
cities of Boise, Meridian, Nampa, and Caldwell, north to the city of New
Meadows on state highway 95 and the city of McCall on state highway 55;
and
(b) A study of how a bypass route might be established south of inter-
state highway I-84 to link the Nampa region, such as where Middleton
road passes over interstate highway I-84, to an area south of the city
of Boise, such as near the blacks creek road exit on interstate highway
I-84.
(3) The department is authorized to utilize prior, relevant studies or
any studies that may already be underway to accomplish the objectives of this
section.
(4) The department is authorized to accept financial donations from
private individuals, businesses, and organizations for the purposes of:
(a) Offsetting the costs of the PEL studies as provided for in this
section, including all associated planning, analysis, and reporting
costs; and
(b) Upon the completion of the PEL studies, additional engineering,
design, and construction costs directly related to the project or
projects identified in the studies.
(5) The department shall maintain detailed records of all funds re-
ceived and expenditures made pursuant to this section. An annual report


summarizing the sources and uses of funds shall be made available to the pub-
lic, and such information shall be included in the report required pursuant
to subsection (6) of this section.
(6) The department shall complete the studies provided for in this sec-
tion on or before July 1, 2027, and shall, on or before that date, publish a
report on its website describing the complete findings of such studies and
issuing recommendations regarding the provisions of subsection (2) of this
section. An electronic copy of the report shall be delivered to the legisla-
tive services office and shall be distributed to the senate and house trans-
portation committees.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.